apertium-oci.oci.metadix
        <pardef n="cre/ire__vblex">  
      <e><p><l>iriam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriái</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriás</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irián</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriá</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irai</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iretz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iràs</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iràn</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irà</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>sent</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>sètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>sètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>siam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>siái</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>siatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>siás</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>sián</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>siá</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>         
      <e><p><l>guèrem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèri</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèretz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guères</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèron</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèt</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>          
      <e><p><l>guèssem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèsse</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e r="LR"><p><l>guèssi</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèssetz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèsses</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèsson</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guèsse</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gudas</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guda</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>guts</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gut</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>sèm</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>sètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ses</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>son</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gas</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>gan</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e r="LR" lm="jaire" alt="oci@aran"><i>ja</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="jaire" alt="oci@gascon"><i>ja</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jaire" alt="oci"><i>ja</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="creire" alt="oci@aran"><i>cre</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="creire" alt="oci@gascon"><i>cre</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="creire" alt="oci"><i>cre</i><par n="cre/ire__vblex"/></e>
